test/src/gt-desc-yamls/noun-contracted_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Contracted syllable nouns belonging to SUOLU, LASIS

Tests:
  Noun - guoru: # SUOLU
    guoru+N+Sg+Nom: guoru
    guoru+N+Sg+Gen: gurro
    guoru+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: gurrome
    guoru+N+Sg+Acc: gurro
    guoru+N+Sg+Ill: gurrui
    guoru+N+Sg+Loc: [gurros, gurros]
    guoru+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: gurrostan
    guoru+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: gurrostat
    guoru+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: gurruinan
    guoru+N+Pl+Acc: gurruid
    guoru+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: gurruidasat
    guoru+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: gurruideameguin
    guoru+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gurroš
    guoru+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: gurrožis

  Noun - riekkis: # LASIS
    riekkis+N+Sg+Nom: riekkis
    riekkis+N+Sg+Gen: rieggá
    riekkis+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: rieggáme
    riekkis+N+Sg+Acc: rieggá
    riekkis+N+Sg+Ill: rieggái
    riekkis+N+Sg+Loc: [rieggás, rieggán]
    riekkis+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: rieggástan
    riekkis+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: rieggástat
    riekkis+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: rieggáinan
    riekkis+N+Pl+Acc: rieggáid
    riekkis+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: rieggáidasat
    riekkis+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: rieggáideameguin
    riekkis+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: rieggáš
    riekkis+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: rieggážis
